North Carolina, session 2025, HB950.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1. Elderly or disabled property tax homestead exclusion.
(a) Exclusion. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner is
designated a special class of property under Article V, Sec. 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The amount of the appraised value of
the residence equal to the exclusion amount is excluded from taxation. The exclusion amount is
the greater of twenty five thousand dollars ($25,000) or fifty one hundred percent (50%) (100%)
of the appraised value of the residence. An owner who receives an exclusion under this section
may not receive other property tax relief.
A qualifying owner is an owner who meets all of the following requirements as of January 1
preceding the taxable year for which the benefit is claimed:
(1) Is at least 65 70 years of age or totally and permanently disabled.
(2) Has an income for the preceding calendar year of not more than the income
eligibility limit.
(3) Is a North Carolina resident.
…
(a2) Income Eligibility Limit. – For the taxable year beginning on July 1, 2008, the income
eligibility limit is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). For taxable years beginning on or after
July 1, 2009, the income eligibility limit is the amount for the preceding year, adjusted by the
same percentage of this amount as the percentage of any cost-of-living adjustment made to the
benefits under Titles II and XVI of the Social Security Act for the preceding calendar year,
rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100.00). On or before July 1 of each year, the
Department of Revenue must determine the income eligibility amount to be in effect for the
taxable year beginning the following July 1 and must notify the assessor of each county of the
amount to be in effect for that taxable year.
…
(c) Application. – An application for the exclusion provided by this section should be
filed during the regular listing period, but may be filed and must be accepted at any time up to
*H950-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and through June 1 preceding the tax year for which the exclusion is claimed. When property is
owned by two or more persons other than husband and wife and one or more of them qualifies
for this exclusion, each owner must apply separately for his or her proportionate share of the
exclusion.
(1) Elderly Applicants. – Persons 65 70 years of age or older may apply for this
exclusion by entering the appropriate information on a form made available
by the assessor under G.S. 105-282.1.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-277.1B reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1B. Property tax homestead circuit breaker.
…
(c) Income Eligibility Limit. – The income eligibility limit provided in G.S.
105-277.1(a2) applies to this section.For the taxable year beginning on July 1, 2008, the income
eligibility limit is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). For taxable years beginning on or after
July 1, 2009, the income eligibility limit is the amount for the preceding year, adjusted by the
same percentage of this amount as the percentage of any cost-of-living adjustment made to the
benefits under Titles II and XVI of the Social Security Act for the preceding calendar year,
rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100.00). On or before July 1 of each year, the
Department of Revenue must determine the income eligibility amount to be in effect for the
taxable year beginning the following July 1 and must notify the assessor of each county of the
amount to be in effect for that taxable year.
…."
SECTION 3. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 950-First Edition